Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6211.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13. A person An individual who was not employed as a local corrections officer before January 1, 2005 but who becomes or seeks to become employed as a local corrections officer on or after January 1, 2005 shall must not be certified or recertified by the council unless he or she the individual meets all of the following conditions: (a) He or she is Is a citizen of the United States and is 18 years of age or older. (b) He or she has Has obtained a high school diploma or attained a passing score on the general education development test indicating a high school graduation level. (c) Not later than 12 months after becoming employed as a local corrections officer, he or she has fulfilled other standards and requirements developed by the board and approved by the council for certification. (d) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subdivision, was not previously employed by any of the following agencies between September 1, 2025 and January 20, 2029: (i) The United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement. (ii) The United States Customs and Border Protection. (iii) The United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. (e) (d) He or she has Has fulfilled standards and requirements developed by the council upon on the recommendation of the board for recertification.